Missouri, session 2026, SB1128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 314, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 314.405, to read as
follows:
314.405. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "The Second Amendment Financial Privacy Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Ammunition", ammunition or cartridge cases,
primers, bullets, or propellant powder designed for use in
any firearm;
(2) "Assign" or "assignment", a covered entity's
policy, process, or practice that labels, links, or
otherwise associates a merchant category code with a
merchant or a payment card transaction in a manner that
allows the covered entity or any other entity facilitating
or processing the payment card transaction to identify
whether a merchant is a firearm retailer or whether a
transaction involves the sale of firearms or ammunition;
(3) "Covered entity", an entity, or agent of an
entity, that establishes a relationship with a retailer for

SB 1128 2
the purpose of processing credit, debit, or prepaid
transactions;
(4) "Firearm", the same meaning as is ascribed to the
term in section 571.010, or any firearm component or
accessory;
(5) "Firearm retailer", any person or entity that is
physically located in this state and is engaged in the
lawful selling or trading of firearms, antique firearms, or
ammunition to be used in firearms or antique firearms;
(6) "Government entity", the state, a political
subdivision of the state, or any court, agency, or
instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision of
the state;
(7) "Merchant category code", the code, approved by
the International Organization for Standardization or an
equivalent successor organization specifically for firearm
retailers, that is assigned to a retailer based on the types
of goods and services offered to a retailer's customers;
(8) "Payment card", a credit card, charge card, debit
card, or any other card that is issued to a customer and
allows the customer to purchase goods or services from a
merchant;
(9) "Payment card network", an entity, or agent of an
entity, that provides the proprietary services,
infrastructure, or software to conduct payment card
transaction authorizations, clearances, and settlements, and
that an entity uses to accept as a form of payment a brand
of payment card or other device that may be used to carry
out debit or credit transactions;
(10) "Payment card transaction", any transaction in
which a payment card is accepted as payment.

SB 1128 3
3. Except for those records kept during the regular
course of a criminal investigation and prosecution, or as
otherwise required by law, no government entity or official
and no agent or employee of a government entity shall
knowingly keep or cause to be kept any list, record, or
registry of privately owned firearms or the owners of those
firearms.
4. No payment card network shall require or
incentivize the use of a merchant category code in a manner
that distinguishes a firearm retailer from other retailers.
5. No covered entity shall assign a firearm retailer a
merchant category code that distinguishes the firearm
retailer from other retailers.
6. The attorney general shall investigate reasonable
allegations that a person or entity, including a government
entity, has violated the provisions of this section and,
upon finding a violation, provide written notice to the
person or entity believed to have committed the violation.
The person or entity shall cease the violation within thirty
business days after receiving written notice from the
attorney general in accordance with this section.
7. (1) If a person or entity does not cease the
violation within thirty days after receiving written notice
from the attorney general in accordance with this section,
the attorney general shall file an action against that
person or entity to seek an injunction.
(2) If the court finds that the person or entity
violated the provisions of this section and has not ceased
the activity constituting the violation, the court shall
enjoin the person or entity from continuing such activity
and shall award attorney fees and costs.

SB 1128 4
(3) If a person or entity purposely fails to comply
with an injunction issued in accordance with this subsection
after thirty business days of being served with the
injunction, the attorney general, upon petition to the
court, shall seek to impose on that person or entity a civil
penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars per
violation. In assessing such a civil penalty, the court
shall consider factors resulting from the violation,
including the financial resources of the violator and the
harm or risk of harm to the rights under the Second
Amendment to the United States Constitution and article I,
section 23 of the Missouri Constitution.
(4) Any order assessing a civil penalty in accordance
with this subsection shall be stayed pending appeal of the
order.
8. The attorney general has exclusive authority to
enforce the provisions of this section. The remedies set
forth in this section are the exclusive remedies for any
violation of this section.
9. It shall be a defense to a proceeding initiated in
accordance with this section that a merchant category code
100 was required to be permitted or assigned by law.
✓